bg-BG: Стил на помощното средство за подравняване: Само очертание на дупката; Маркери за разстояние; Множество линии; Без маркировка; Графики за насочване на пътя; Права линия; Друго
pt-BR: Estilo de auxílio de alinhamento: Apenas contorno do buraco; Marcadores de distância; Várias linhas; Sem marcações; Gráficos de guia de caminho; Linha reta; Outro
hu: Igazítási segédeszköz stílusa: Csak a csésze körvonala; Távolságjelölők; Többvonalas; Nincs jelölés; Pályavezető grafika; Egyenes vonal; Egyéb
zh-CN: 对齐辅助样式: 仅球洞轮廓; 距离标记; 多条线; 无标记; 路线引导图形; 直线; 其他
el: Στυλ βοηθήματος ευθυγράμμισης: Μόνο περίγραμμα κυπέλλου; Δείκτες απόστασης; Πολλαπλές γραμμές; Χωρίς σημάνσεις; Γραφικά οδηγού διαδρομής; Ευθεία γραμμή; Άλλο
hr-HR: Stil pomoćnih oznaka za poravnanje: Samo obris rupe; Oznake udaljenosti; Više linija; Bez oznaka; Grafike za vođenje putanje; Ravna linija; Ostalo
ja: 位置合わせ補助スタイル: カップの輪郭のみ; 距離マーカー; 複数の線; マーキングなし; パスガイドグラフィック; 直線; その他
lt-LT: Lygiavimo pagalbos tipas: Tik duobutės kontūras; Atstumo žymos; Kelios linijos; Be žymų; Trajektorijos grafika; Tiesi linija; Kita
en: Alignment aid style: Cup Outline Only; Distance Markers; Multiple Lines; No Markings; Path Guide Graphics; Straight Line; Other
zh-TW: 對齊輔助樣式: 僅罩杯輪廓; 距離標記; 多條線; 無標記; 路徑指南圖形; 直線; 其他
vi: Kiểu hỗ trợ căn chỉnh: Chỉ viền lỗ gôn; Vạch báo khoảng cách; Nhiều đường; Không có vạch báo; Hình ảnh hướng dẫn đường bóng; Đường thẳng; Khác
sk-SK: Štýl pomôcky na zarovnanie: Iba obrys jamky; Značky vzdialenosti; Viaceré čiary; Bez značiek; Grafika na vedenie dráhy; Rovná čiara; Iný
es: Estilo de ayuda para la alineación: Solo contorno del hoyo; Marcadores de distancia; Múltiples líneas; Sin marcas; Gráficos de guía de trayectoria; Línea recta; Otro
sl-SI: Slog pripomočka za poravnavo: Samo obris luknje; Oznake razdalje; Več črt; Brez oznak; Grafike za vodenje poti; Ravna črta; Drugo
sv: Justeringsguider: Endast hålets kontur; Avståndsmarkörer; Flera linjer; Inga markeringar; Grafik för vägledning; Rak linje; Annan
fi: Kohdistusapuviivojen tyyli: Vain kupin ääriviivat; Etäisyysmerkit; Useita viivoja; Ei merkintöjä; Reittiohjaimen grafiikka; Suora viiva; Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de guia de alinhamento: Apenas contorno do buraco; Marcadores de distância; Várias linhas; Sem marcações; Gráficos de guia de trajetória; Linha reta; Outro
da: Stil for justeringshjælp: Kun hullets omrids; Afstandsmarkører; Flere linjer; Ingen markeringer; Banevejledningsgrafik; Lige linje; Andet
tr: Hizalama kılavuzu stili: Yalnızca delik dış hatları; Mesafe işaretleri; Birden fazla çizgi; İşaret yok; Yol kılavuz grafikleri; Düz çizgi; Diğer
nb: Stil for justeringshjelpemiddel: Kun koppomriss; Avstandsmarkører; Flere linjer; Ingen markeringer; Baneveiledningsgrafikk; Rett linje; Annet
ru: Тип ориентировочных линий: Только контур лунки; Маркеры расстояния; Несколько линий; Без разметки; Графика направляющей линии; Прямая линия; Другое
de: Art der Ausrichtungshilfe: Nur Lochumriss; Entfernungsmarkierungen; Mehrere Linien; Keine Markierungen; Grafiken zur Pfadführung; Gerade Linie; Sonstige
nl: Stijl uitlijnhulp: Alleen cup-contour; Afstandsmarkeringen; Meerdere lijnen; Geen markeringen; Baanbegeleidende afbeeldingen; Rechte lijn; Overig
pl: Typ elementów ułatwiających wyrównanie: Tylko obrys dołka; Znaczniki odległości; Wiele linii; Brak oznaczeń; Graficzne linie ścieżki; Prosta linia; Inny
fr: Type d’aide à l’alignement: Contour de coupe uniquement; Marqueurs de distance; Lignes multiples; Aucun marquage; Graphiques de guide de trajectoire; Ligne droite; Autre
ko: 정렬 보조 스타일: 컵 윤곽선 전용; 거리 마커; 다중 선; 표시 없음; 경로 안내 그래픽; 직선; 기타
th: รูปแบบอุปกรณ์ช่วยจัดแนว: โครงร่างถ้วยเท่านั้น; เครื่องหมายบอกระยะ; เส้นหลายเส้น; ไม่มีเครื่องหมาย; กราฟิกแนะนำเส้นทาง; เส้นตรง; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ vyrovnávací pomůcky: Pouze obrys jamky; Značky vzdálenosti; Více čar; Bez značení; Grafika navádění dráhy; Rovná čára; Jiné
it: Stile di ausilio per l'allineamento: Solo contorno buca; Indicatori di distanza; Linee multiple; Nessun segno; Grafiche di traiettoria; Linea retta; Altro
ro-RO: Stilul de ajutor pentru aliniere: Doar conturul cupei; Marcaje de distanță; Linii multiple; Fără marcaje; Grafică de ghidare a traiectoriei; Linie dreaptă; Altele